Washington statutes.
RCW 16.57.165

Agreements with others to perform livestock inspection.

The director may, in order to reduce the cost of inspection to livestock owners, enter into agreements with any qualified county, municipal, or other local law enforcement agency, or qualified individuals for the purpose of performing livestock inspection in areas where inspection by the director may not readily be available.

[ 2003 c 326 s 19; 1971 ex.s. c 135 s 6.]